Alaska, session 34, HB134.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 04 * Section 1. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section 05 to read: 06 SHORT TITLE. This Act may be known as the Alaska Child Access Prevention and 07 Secure Storage of Firearms Act. 08 * Sec. 2. AS 11.61.210(a) is amended to read: 09 (a) A person commits the crime of misconduct involving weapons in the 10 fourth degree if the person 11 (1) possesses on the person, or in the interior of a vehicle in which the 12 person is present, a firearm when the person's physical or mental condition is impaired 13 as a result of the introduction of an intoxicating liquor or a controlled substance into 14 the person's body in circumstances other than described in AS 11.61.200(a)(7); 01 (2) discharges a firearm from, on, or across a highway; 02 (3) discharges a firearm with reckless disregard for a risk of damage to 03 property or a risk of physical injury to a person under circumstances other than those 04 described in AS 11.61.195(a)(3)(A); 05 (4) manufactures, possesses, transports, sells, or transfers metal 06 knuckles; 07 (5) sells or transfers a switchblade or a gravity knife to a person under 08 18 years of age without the prior written consent of the person's parent or guardian; 09 (6) knowingly sells a firearm or a defensive weapon to a person under 10 18 years of age; 11 (7) other than a preschool, elementary, junior high, or secondary 12 school student, knowingly possesses a deadly weapon or a defensive weapon, without 13 the permission of the chief administrative officer of the school or district or the 14 designee of the chief administrative officer, within the buildings of, on the grounds of, 15 or on the school parking lot of a public or private preschool, elementary, junior high, 16 or secondary school, on a school bus while being transported to or from school or a 17 school-sponsored event, or while participating in a school-sponsored event, except that 18 a person 21 years of age or older may possess 19 (A) a deadly weapon, other than a loaded firearm, in the trunk 20 of a motor vehicle or encased in a closed container in a motor vehicle; 21 (B) a defensive weapon; 22 (C) an unloaded firearm if the person is traversing school 23 premises in a rural area for the purpose of entering public or private land that is 24 open to hunting and the school board with jurisdiction over the school 25 premises has elected to have this exemption apply to the school premises; in 26 this subparagraph, "rural" means a community with a population of 5,500 or 27 less that is not connected by road or rail to Anchorage or Fairbanks or with a 28 population of 1,500 or less that is connected by road or rail to Anchorage or 29 Fairbanks; [OR] 30 (8) being a preschool, elementary, junior high, or secondary school 31 student, knowingly possesses a deadly weapon or a defensive weapon, within the 01 buildings of, on the grounds of, or on the school parking lot of a public or private 02 preschool, elementary, junior high, or secondary school, on a school bus while being 03 transported to or from school or a school-sponsored event, or while participating in a 04 school-sponsored event, except that a student may possess a deadly weapon, other 05 than a firearm as defined under 18 U.S.C. 921, or a defensive weapon if the student 06 has obtained the prior permission of the chief administrative officer of the school or 07 district or the designee of the chief administrative officer for the possession; or 08 (9) violates AS 11.61.225 and, as a result of the violation, an 09 individual under 18 years of age or a prohibited person uses the firearm to 10 commit a crime or injure self or another; in this paragraph, "prohibited person" 11 has the meaning given in AS 11.61.225(b). 12 * Sec. 3. AS 11.61 is amended by adding a new section to read: 13 Sec. 11.61.225. Misconduct involving weapons in the sixth degree. (a) A 14 person commits the offense of misconduct involving weapons in the sixth degree if the 15 person 16 (1) keeps on a premises a firearm that is not carried by, or otherwise 17 under the control of, the owner or an authorized person; and 18 (2) knows or reasonably should know that an individual under 18 years 19 of age, who is not an owner or authorized person, or a prohibited person is able to gain 20 access to a firearm owned or under the control of the person and the person fails to 21 secure the firearm in a locked container, with a gun lock, or by other means to render 22 the firearm inaccessible or unable to be used by a person who is not the owner or an 23 authorized person. 24 (b) In this section, 25 (1) "authorized person" means a person granted permission by the 26 owner or a person in possession of a firearm to carry or control the firearm on a 27 temporary basis while in the presence of the owner or person in possession; 28 (2) "control" means a firearm is within a proximity of the owner or an 29 authorized person that allows the owner or authorized person to 30 (A) retrieve and use the firearm in the same manner as if the 31 firearm were carried on the person of the owner or authorized person; and 01 (B) prevent another person who is not an authorized person 02 from obtaining the firearm; 03 (3) "locked container" means a storage device approved, or that meets 04 specifications established by, the Department of Public Safety; 05 (4) "prohibited person" means a person who is prohibited from 06 possessing a firearm under 18 U.S.C. 922(g) or by state law. 07 (c) Misconduct involving weapons in the sixth degree is a violation punishable 08 by a fine of not more than $1,000. 09 * Sec. 4. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section to 10 read: 11 APPLICABILITY. This Act applies to offenses committed on or after the effective 12 date of this Act. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.